tests/passives.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    App: hfst-lookup
    Gen: ../kum.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../kum.automorf.hfst

Tests:
  "[twol] Front-vowel-final verb":
    терге<v><tv><pass><ifi><p3><sg> : тергелди

  "[twol] Back-vowel-final verb":
    сана<v><tv><pass><ifi><p3><sg> : саналды

  "[twol] Front-vowel+Cons-final verb":
    эт<v><tv><pass><ifi><p3><sg> : этилди
    оьтгер<v><tv><pass><ifi><p3><sg> : оьтгерилди
    оьлтюр<v><tv><pass><ifi><p3><sg> : оьлтюрюлдю

  "[twol] Back-vowel+Cons-final verb":
    чакъыр<v><tv><pass><ifi><p3><sg> : чакъырылды
    къош<v><tv><pass><ifi><p3><sg> : къошулду
    къур<v><tv><pass><ifi><p3><sg> : къурулду

  "[twol] L+front-vowel-final verb":
    сёйле<v><tv><pass><ifi><p3><sg> : сёйленди
    ишле<v><tv><pass><ifi><p3><sg> : ишленди

  "[twol] Front-vowel+L-final verb":
    ил<v><tv><pass><ifi><p3><sg> : илинди
    бёл<v><tv><pass><ifi><p3><sg> : бёлюндю

  "[twol] Back-vowel+L-final verb":
    башла<v><tv><pass><ifi><p3><sg> : башланды
    байла<v><tv><pass><ifi><p3><sg> : байланды

  "[twol] Back-vowel+B-final verb":
    тап<v><tv><pass><ifi><p3><sg> : табулду

  "[twol] Voicing of К":
    йыкъ<v><tv><pass><ifi><p3><sg> : йыгъылды

  "[twol] irregular passive of гёр":
    гёр<v><tv><pass><ifi><p3><sg> : гёрюндю

#FIXME: what about forms like ишлетилинди, гёрсетилинди, ойлашылынды,  ??
